New York, session 2025-2026, S4254.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 230 of the public health law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 20 to read as follows: 3 20. All information, findings, conclusions and determinations which 4 are authorized or required to be disclosed to the public shall be 5 published in both written and electronic form in the eight languages 6 which are most spoken in this state. 7 § 2. Section 2997-a of the public health law, as added by chapter 542 8 of the laws of 2000, is amended to read as follows: 9 § 2997-a. Public access. 1. Nothing in this title shall abridge public 10 access to information currently available or permitted by any other 11 provision or rule of law. Nothing in this title shall not authorize the 12 disclosure of otherwise confidential information, except pursuant to the 13 express terms of this title. 14 2. All information made available to the public pursuant to this title 15 shall be provided in both written and electronic form in the eight 16 languages which are most spoken in this state. 17 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 18 it shall have became a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 19 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 20 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 21 completed on or before such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07960-01-5